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DTC P0 115/22WaterTemp.CircuitMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
A thermistor built into the water temp. sensor changes the resistance value according to the water tempera-
ture.
The structure of the sensor and connection to the engine ECU is the same as in the DTC P0110/24 (Intake
Air Temp. Circuit Malfunction) shown on page DI−33.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0115/22 Openorshort inwater temp.sensorcircuit
SOpenorshort inwater temp.sensorcircuit
SWater temp.sensor
SEngineECU

HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTCP0115/22use thehand −held tester toconfirm thewater temperature fromCURRENT
DATA.

Temperature Displayed Malfunction

−40˚ C (−40˚ F) Open circuit

140˚ C(284 ˚F)ormore Short circuit

WIRING DIAGRAM
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When using hand−held tester
HINT:
S If DTC P0110/24 (Intake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunction), P0115/22 (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction),

P0120/41 (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction), P1120/19 (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor
Circuit Malfunction) are output simultaneously, E2 (sensor ground) may be open.

S Read freeze frame data using hand−held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air−fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time
of the malfunction.

1 Connecthand −held tester,andreadvalueofwater temperature.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandswitch thehand −held testermainswitchON.
CHECK:
Read temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Same as actual water temperature
HINT:
S If there isopencircuit,Hand −held tester indicates −40˚ C (−40˚ F).
S If there isshort circuit,Hand −held tester indicates140 ˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore.

NG −40˚ C (−40˚ F)...Gotostep2.
140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore...Gotostep4.

OK

Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−4) .
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2 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.
(b) Connect sensor wire harness terminals together.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: 140�C (284�F) or more

OK Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK,
replace water temp. sensor.

NG

3 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connect between terminals THW and E2 of the engine

ECU connector.
HINT:
Water temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
Before checking, do a visual and contact pressure check for the
engine ECU connector (See page IN−19).
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140�C(284 �F)ormore

OK Open in harness between terminals E2 or THW,
repair or replace harness.

NG

Confirm good connection at engine ECU.
If OK, check and replace engine ECU.
(See page IN−1 9)
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4 Check for short in harness and engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: −40�C (−40�F)

OK Replace water temp. sensor.

NG

5 Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E8 connector of the engine ECU.
HINT:
Water temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: −40�C (−40�F)

OK Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .
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When not using hand−held tester

1 Check voltage between terminals THW and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals THW and E2 of engine
ECU connector.
OK:

Water temperature Voltage

20˚ C (68˚ F) 0.5 − 3.4 V

60˚C (140˚F) 0.2 − 1.0 V

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

2 Check water temp. sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the water temp. sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals.
OK:
Resistance is within acceptable zone on chart.

Water temperature Resistance

20˚C (68˚F) 2 − 3 k�

80˚C (176˚F) 0.2 − 0.4 k�

NG Replace water temp. sensor.

OK
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3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
water temp. sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


